Washington statutes.
RCW 36.71.090

Farmers, gardeners, etc., peddling own produce exempt from license requirements—Exception.

It shall be lawful for any farmer, gardener, or other person, without license, to sell, deliver, or peddle any fruits, vegetables, berries, eggs, or any farm produce or edibles raised, gathered, produced, or manufactured by such person and no city or town shall pass or enforce any ordinance prohibiting the sale by or requiring license from the producers and manufacturers of farm produce and edibles as defined in this section. However, nothing in this section authorizes any person to sell, deliver, or peddle, without license, in any city or town, any dairy product, meat, poultry, eel, fish, mollusk, or shellfish where a license is required to engage legally in such activity in such city or town.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 8 s 56; 2003 c 387 s 5; 2002 c 301 s 9; 1984 c 25 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.71.090. Prior: 1917 c 45 s 1; 1897 c 62 s 1; RRS s 8343.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 8: See notes following RCW 77.08.010.

Finding—Effective date—2002 c 301: See notes following RCW 77.65.510.